dev/apertium-swe.pre-saldo-swe.dix
<pardef n="aktie__n" c="autoconcord:ut,sgpl"> <!-- Common; ~ / ~n / ~r / ~rna -->
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="Ø__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>n</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>r</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rna</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="koppar__n" c="autoconcord:ut,sgpl"> <!-- Common; ~ / ~en / # / #; uncountable -->
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both\Ø_LR_s\S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="början__n" c="autoconcord:ut,sp"> <!-- Common; ~ / ~ / ~ / #; uncountable, no plural definite -->
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="skam__n" c="autoconcord:ut,sgpl"> <!-- Common; ~ / ~men / # / #; uncountable -->
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both\Ø_LR_s\S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>men</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="bris__n" c="autoconcord:ut,sgpl"> <!-- Common; ~ / ~en / ~er | (~ar) / ~erna -->
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="Ø__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ar</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erna</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR" a="PT"><p><l>arna</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="adel__n" c="autoconcord:ut,sgpl"> <!-- Common; ~ / ~n / # / #; uncountable -->
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both\Ø_LR_s\S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>n</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="mytologi__n" c="autoconcord:ut,sgpl"> <!-- Common; ~ / ~n | (~en) / # / #; uncountable -->
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both\Ø_LR_s\S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>n</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>en</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="mars__n" c="autoconcord:ut,sgpl"> <!-- Common; ~ / ~månaden / ~månader / ~månaderna; invariant in singular indefinite genitive -->
  <!-- PT: <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e> -->
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p><par n="Ø__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>månaden</l>   <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>månader</l>   <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>månaderna</l> <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="april__n" c="autoconcord:ut,sgpl"> <!-- Common; ~ / ~månaden / ~månader / ~månaderna -->
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both\Ø_LR_s\S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>månaden</l>   <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>månader</l>   <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>månaderna</l> <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>

</pardef>

<pardef n="histori/a__n" c="autoconcord:ut,sgpl"> <!-- Common; ~a / ~en | (~an) / ~er / ~erna -->
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both\Ø_LR_s\S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>an</l>        <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erna</l>      <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="kolleg/a__n" c="autoconcord:ut,sgpl"> <!-- Common; ~a / ~an / ~er | (~or) / ~erna | (~orna) -->
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both\Ø_LR_s\S__case"/></e>
  <e a="PT">       <p><l>an</l>        <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>or</l>        <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>er</l>        <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>orna</l>      <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>erna</l>      <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="st/ad__n" c="autoconcord:ut,sgpl"> <!-- Common; ~ad / ~aden / ~äder / ~äderna -->
  <e>       <p><l>ad</l>        <r>ad<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both\Ø_LR_s\S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aden</l>      <r>ad<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR" c="style:fam" a="PT">       <p><l>an</l>      <r>ad<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>äder</l>      <r>ad<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>äderna</l>    <r>ad<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="m/an__n" c="autoconcord:ut,sgpl"> <!-- Common; ~an / ~annen / ~än / ~ännen -->
  <e>       <p><l>an</l>        <r>an<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both\Ø_LR_s\S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>annen</l>     <r>an<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>än</l>        <r>an<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ännen</l>     <r>an<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="februari"><i>februari</i><par n="april__n"/></e>
<e lm="mars"><i>mars</i><par n="mars__n"/></e>
<e lm="april"><i>april</i><par n="april__n"/></e>
<e lm="juni"><i>juni</i><par n="april__n"/></e>
<e lm="augusti"><i>augusti</i><par n="april__n"/></e>
<e lm="oktober"><i>oktober</i><par n="april__n"/></e>
<e lm="december"><i>december</i><par n="april__n"/></e>
<e lm="demokrati">       <i>demokrati</i><par n="mytologi__n"/></e>
<e lm="mytologi">        <i>mytologi</i><par n="mytologi__n"/></e>
<e lm="man">             <i>m</i><par n="m/an__n"/></e>
<e lm="statsman">        <i>statsm</i><par n="m/an__n"/></e>
<e lm="polisman">        <i>polism</i><par n="m/an__n"/></e>
<e lm="klöver">          <i>klöver</i><par n="adel__n"/></e>
<e lm="avsky">           <i>avsky</i><par n="adel__n"/></e>
<e lm="dynamit">         <i>dynamit</i><par n="koppar__n"/></e>
<e lm="hetta">           <i>hetta</i><par n="adel__n"/></e>
<e lm="kondition">       <i>kondition</i><par n="koppar__n"/></e>
<e lm="panik">           <i>panik</i><par n="koppar__n"/></e>
<e lm="radio">           <i>radio</i><par n="aktie__n"/></e>
<e lm="skam">            <i>skam</i><par n="skam__n"/></e>
<e lm="rom">             <i>rom</i><par n="skam__n"/></e>
<e lm="majs">            <i>majs</i><par n="bris__n"/></e>
<e lm="sprit">           <i>sprit</i><par n="koppar__n"/></e>
<e lm="bostad">          <i>bost</i><par n="st/ad__n"/></e>
<e lm="stad">            <i>st</i><par n="st/ad__n"/></e>
<e lm="historia">        <i>histori</i><par n="histori/a__n"/></e>
<e lm="huvudstad">       <i>huvudst</i><par n="st/ad__n"/></e>
<e lm="storstad">        <i>storst</i><par n="st/ad__n"/></e>
<e lm="rodd">            <i>rodd</i><par n="koppar__n"/></e>
<e lm="metanol">         <i>metanol</i><par n="koppar__n"/></e>
<e lm="kemikalie" a="is"><i>kemikalie</i><par n="aktie__n"/></e>
<e lm="avvikelse" a="is"><i>avvikelse</i><par n="aktie__n"/></e>
<e lm="misshandel" a="is"><i>misshandel</i><par n="adel__n"/></e>
<e lm="studie" a="is">   <i>studie</i><par n="aktie__n"/></e>
<e lm="sjöman" a="is">   <i>sjöm</i><par n="m/an__n"/></e>
<e lm="bekräftelse" a="is"><i>bekräftelse</i><par n="aktie__n"/></e>
<e lm="påminnelse" a="is"><i>påminnelse</i><par n="aktie__n"/></e>
<e lm="affärsman" a="is"><i>affärsm</i><par n="m/an__n"/></e>
<e lm="början av året" a="is"><i>början</i><par n="början__n"/><p><l>av<b/>året</l><r><g>av<b/>året</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="efterfrågan" a="is"><i>efterfrågan</i><par n="början__n"/></e>
<e lm="fruktan" a="is">  <i>fruktan</i><par n="början__n"/></e>
<e lm="förtvivlan" a="is"><i>förtvivlan</i><par n="början__n"/></e>
<e lm="längtan" a="is">  <i>längtan</i><par n="början__n"/></e>
<e lm="norrman" a="is">  <i>norrm</i><par n="m/an__n"/></e>
<e lm="sjömil" a="is">   <i>sjömil</i><par n="början__n"/></e>
<e lm="uppfostran" a="is"><i>uppfostran</i><par n="början__n"/></e>
<e lm="bris" a="SALDO">            <i>bris</i><par n="bris__n"/></e>
<e lm="dy" a="SALDO">              <i>dy</i><par n="adel__n"/></e>
<e lm="fönsterbräda" a="SALDO">    <i>fönsterbräd</i><par n="kolleg/a__n"/></e>
<e lm="kobra" a="SALDO">           <i>kobr</i><par n="kolleg/a__n"/></e>
<e lm="kvällsbris" a="SALDO">            <i>bris</i><par n="bris__n"/></e>
<e lm="landbris" a="SALDO">            <i>bris</i><par n="bris__n"/></e>
<e lm="långpanna" a="SALDO">       <i>långpann</i><par n="kolleg/a__n"/></e>
<e lm="morgonbris" a="SALDO">            <i>bris</i><par n="bris__n"/></e>
<e lm="platta" a="SALDO">          <i>platt</i><par n="kolleg/a__n"/></e>
<e lm="sjöbris" a="SALDO">            <i>bris</i><par n="bris__n"/></e>
<e lm="stekpanna" a="SALDO">       <i>stekpann</i><par n="kolleg/a__n"/></e>
<e lm="verkstad" a="SALDO">        <i>verkst</i><par n="st/ad__n"/></e>
<e lm="vira" a="SALDO">            <i>vir</i><par n="kolleg/a__n"/></e>
<e lm="vitpeppar" a="SALDO">       <i>vitpeppar</i><par n="adel__n"/></e>
<e lm="ögonvrå" a="SALDO">         <i>ögonvrå</i><par n="aktie__n"/></e>
<e lm="köpstad" a="PT">              <i>köpstad</i><par n="st/ad__n"/></e>
<e lm="handfull" a="PT">              <i>handfull</i><par n="koppar__n"/></e>
